District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.02a

Transfer of authority of the Armory Board.

All references to the Armory Board in subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 3 [§ 3-301 et seq.], are deemed to be references to the Authority, and the Authority shall have such powers and responsibilities as are created by such references to the Armory Board in subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 3 unless the clear meaning requires otherwise.

History

Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 202a
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2081(d), 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2081(d) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2081(d) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).